Mississippi, session 2026, SB2528.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Short title.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Farmland, Migratory Bird, and Rural Protection from Industrial Wind Facilities Act." (2)  Legislative purpose. The purpose of this act is to: (a)  Protect prime and unique agricultural lands, aquifers, rural communities and agricultural aviation operations from adverse impacts associated with industrial-scale wind energy facilities; (b)  Safeguard migratory birds, raptors, bats, waterfowl and other wildlife using the Mississippi Flyway, consistent with federal law, including the Migratory Bird Treaty Act, and with Mississippi statutes protecting wild birds, nests and eggs; and (c)  Establish clear, uniform statewide standards governing the siting, construction, operation, monitoring, decommissioning, financial assurance and enforcement of wind energy facilities. (3)  Legislative findings.  The Legislature finds and declares that: (a)  Mississippi's agricultural lands are essential to the state's economy, food supply and rural heritage, and that industrial wind turbines and associated infrastructure may adversely affect soil health, drainage, aquifers, irrigation systems, agricultural aviation safety and crop productivity; (b)  Mississippi lies within the Mississippi Flyway, a major international migratory bird route, and industrial wind turbines are documented to cause mortality and injury to migratory birds, raptors, bats and waterfowl, including species protected under federal law; (c)  Mississippi law protects wild birds and their nests and eggs, and federal law provides additional protections; reinforcing these protections through siting and operational standards for wind energy facilities serves the public interest; (d)  Large industrial wind turbines may impose significant impacts on surrounding property owners, wildlife resources, aquifers, agricultural operations and rural communities; (e)  While Mississippi currently has limited wind generation, recent wind resource assessments indicate increasing technical potential, which, absent prudent regulation, could result in widespread siting of industrial wind facilities on agricultural lands and in rural communities; and (f)  Given the predominantly agricultural and rural character of the state, and the cultural and economic importance of migratory birds and waterfowl hunting, it is in the public interest to impose stringent limitations on the siting of new industrial wind facilities. SECTION 2. (1)  Definitions.  For the purposes of this act, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein, unless context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Industrial wind facility" means: (i)  Any wind turbine with a nameplate capacity of one (1) megawatt or greater; or (ii)  Any group of wind turbines with a combined nameplate capacity of five (5) megawatts or greater, including all associated towers, foundations, electrical collection systems, substations, transformers, transmission interconnections, energy storage systems, operations and maintenance buildings, meteorological towers, access roads, crane paths, laydown areas and related infrastructure. (b)  "Small wind energy system" means one or more wind turbines with a combined nameplate capacity of less than one hundred kilowatts (100kW) that serve on-site electrical demand only and are not located on prime or unique farmland. (c)  "Prime farmland" and "unique farmland" have the meanings assigned by the United States Department of Agriculture, Natural Resources Conservation Service, as amended. (d)  "Mississippi Flyway high-risk zone" means areas identified and mapped by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries, and Parks, in consultation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, as areas of concentrated use by migratory birds, raptors, bats or waterfowl, including associated buffer zones. (e)  "Agricultural aviation operations area" means any area within ten (10) miles of an airport, airstrip or landing area used for agricultural aviation or aerial application activities and registered with the Federal Aviation Administration or the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce. (f)  "Federal Aviation Regulations, 14 CFR Par 77" means the regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration codified at Title 14, Code of Federal Regulations, Part 77, entitled "Safe, Efficient Use, and Preservation of the Navigable Airspace," adopted under 49 USC § 44718 and related provisions, as amended. (g)  "FAA obstruction evaluation" means the review conducted pursuant to 49 USC § 44718 and 14 CFR Part 77, including applicable FAA orders, advisory circulars and guidance. (h) "Determination of Hazard" and "Determination of No Hazard" mean written determinations issued by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR Part 77 regarding the effect of a proposed structure on the safe and efficient use of navigable airspace. (i)  "Radar interference" means adverse effects of wind turbines or associated structures on the performance of air traffic control, national defense, homeland security, weather or other critical radar systems, including clutter, shadowing, false targets, loss of detection sensitivity or degraded tracking, as identified by the Federal Aviation Administration, the United States Department of Defense, the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration or other participating federal agencies. (2)  Applicability. (a)  This act applies to all new industrial wind facilities proposed, permitted or constructed in the State of Mississippi on or after the effective date of this act. (b)  Small wind energy systems remain subject to Sections 3 and 5 of this act and any rules adopted pursuant thereto. SECTION 3. (1)  Prohibition on approvals.  Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, no state agency, political subdivision, public utility, electric cooperative or other entity with permitting, zoning or regulatory authority shall approve, permit, construct or operate a new industrial wind facility within the State of Mississippi. (2)  Void authorizations. Any permit, certificate, zoning approval, license, easement, lease, tax incentive or other authorization issued on or after the effective date of this act that purports to authorize a new industrial wind facility in violation of this act is void and of no force or effect. (3)  Statewide preemption.  (a)  This act occupies the field of siting and regulation of industrial wind facilities.  No county, municipality, or other political subdivision may adopt or enforce any ordinance or regulation that authorizes or materially facilitates an industrial wind facility prohibited by this act. (b)  Nothing in this subsection prohibits political subdivisions from adopting more restrictive provisions consistent with this act, including increased setbacks, additional environmental protections, or local prohibitions. (4)  Exceptions.  The prohibition in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to: (a)  Small wind energy systems as defined in Section 2(1)(b) of this act; (b)  Any industrial wind facility that, as of the effective date of this act, is fully constructed and in commercial operation, which shall be subject to Sections 6 through 8 of this act; or (c)  Any industrial wind facility expressly authorized by a general law enacted after the effective date of this act that specifically references and exempts the facility from this act. SECTION 4. (1)  Farmland restrictions.  No industrial wind facility may be sited, constructed or operated: (a)  On prime farmland or unique farmland; or (b)  Within two (2) miles of prime or unique farmland, unless the owner of such farmland provides written consent and the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce determines in writing that the facility will not materially impair agricultural productivity, drainage, irrigation or soil health. (2)  Setbacks.  Any wind turbine permitted under a lawful exception shall meet the greater of the following setbacks: (a)  Three (3) times the total turbine height from any occupied dwelling; or (b)  One and one-half (1.5) times the total turbine height from any property line, public road or utility right-of-way, unless a more restrictive local setback applies. (3)  Water resource protection.  (a)  No turbine foundation, substation, transformer yard, or other permanent structure may be located within a designated wellhead protection area, source water protection area, or within one-half (0.5) mile of a public drinking water supply well, unless approved in writing by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality subject to protective conditions. (b)  Construction and operation shall not alter drainage patterns or increase flood risk to adjacent lands.  Any disturbed drainage tile or irrigation system shall be restored to equal or better condition at the developer's expense. (4)  Agricultural aviation.  (a)  No wind turbine may be located within an agricultural aviation operations area if the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce determines that the facility would materially interfere with aerial application safety or operations. (b)  A written determination of no material interference is required as a condition precedent to any approval. (5)  Noise and shadow flicker.  (a)  Noise shall not exceed forty (40) dBA (A-weighted decibels) at the property line of a nonparticipating landowner. (b)  Shadow flicker on an occupied residence shall not exceed thirty (30) hours per year. (c)  A violation of this subsection constitutes a nuisance per se. SECTION 5. (1)  Compliance with wildlife laws.  All wind energy systems, including small wind energy systems, shall comply with: (a)  The Migratory Bird Treaty Act and applicable federal regulations; (b)  Federal protections for bald and golden eagles and for threatened or endangered species, where applicable; (c)  Mississippi statutes protecting wild birds, raptors, nests and eggs; and (d)  Rules adopted by the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries, and Parks pursuant to this act. (2)  Prohibited siting areas.  No wind turbine may be sited, constructed or operated: (a)  Within any state or federal wildlife refuge, wildlife management area, conservation area or wetland easement; (b)  Within any Mississippi Flyway high-risk zone or associated buffer established by rule; or (c)  Within one (1) mile of any documented waterfowl concentration area, major duck roost or duck hunting management area designated by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries, and Parks. (3)  Rules for wildlife protection.  The Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries, and Parks, in consultation with the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, shall adopt rules requiring: (a)  Preconstruction surveys for avian, waterfowl, raptor and bat species, including habitat assessments and migratory use analyses; (b)  Operational restrictions during peak migration periods within the Mississippi Flyway, including mandatory curtailment or shutdown during high-risk periods identified by the department; (c)  Post-construction mortality monitoring, carcass searches and public reporting of bird and bat fatalities, with minimum survey protocols established by rule; and (d)  Measures to protect resident and migratory ducks and duck hunting activities, including setback or exclusion zones around duck habitats, refuges, leased duck hunting lands and public duck hunting areas. (4)  Corrective action; decommissioning.  If monitoring demonstrates significant mortality of migratory birds, raptors, bats or other protected species, or significant adverse impacts on duck habitat use or hunting activity, the permitting or enforcing authority shall order appropriate corrective action, including operational modifications, seasonal shutdowns, reductions in turbine number or operating hours or the permanent decommissioning of any turbine or facility contributing to such impacts. SECTION 6. (1)  Grandfathered facilities.  Any industrial wind facility that is fully constructed and in commercial operation before the effective date of this act may continue operation, subject to: (a)  All wildlife protection requirements and rules adopted under Section 5 of this act; (b)  The decommissioning and financial assurance requirements of Section 7 of this act; and (c)  Periodic review and corrective action pursuant to Section 5(4) of this act. (2)  Prohibited expansion.  No grandfathered industrial wind facility may add turbines, increase nameplate capacity or materially expand its physical footprint after the effective date of this act.  Any such expansion shall be treated as a new industrial wind facility subject to the prohibitions of Section 3 of this act. SECTION 7.  (1)  Decommissioning plan.  Each industrial wind facility subject to this act shall maintain a decommissioning plan, approved by the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, that: (a)  Provides for removal of all above-ground equipment and removal of foundations to a depth of not less than four (4) feet below grade upon the earlier of the end of the facility's useful life or twenty-four (24) consecutive months of nonoperation; (b)  Requires restoration of topsoil, drainage and agricultural productivity to preconstruction conditions to the extent practicable; and (c)  Identifies responsible parties, timelines and reporting requirements. (2)  Financial assurance. (a)  The owner or operator shall post and maintain financial assurance in the form of a surety bond, letter of credit or other financial instrument acceptable to the Mississippi Public Service Commission or other designated authority, in an amount sufficient to cover the full cost of decommissioning and site restoration, without reliance on salvage value. (b)  The amount of financial assurance shall be reviewed at least once every five (5) years and adjusted as necessary for inflation and updated cost estimates. (3)  Failure to decommission.  If a responsible party fails to decommission a facility in accordance with an approved plan, the state or an affected political subdivision may draw upon the financial assurance to complete decommissioning and restoration and may pursue any additional remedies authorized by law. SECTION 8. (1)  Enforcement authority.  This act and rules adopted pursuant to it may be enforced by the Mississippi Attorney General, the Mississippi Public Service Commission, the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries, and Parks, the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality and any affected political subdivision. (2)  Available remedies. Remedies for violations of this act or rules adopted under it include: (a)  Injunctive relief to halt construction or operation of a noncompliant turbine or facility; (b)  Civil penalties assessed per day of violation as provided by statute or rule; (c)  Suspension or revocation of permits or approvals; and (d)  Orders requiring curtailment, shutdown or decommissioning pursuant to Sections 5 and 7 of this act. (3)  Private right of action.  Any person who owns property or resides within five (5) miles of a wind turbine or proposed wind turbine and who is adversely affected by a violation of this act or rules adopted under it may bring a civil action for injunctive relief and damages in a court of competent jurisdiction. (4)  Attorneys' fees. The court may award reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff in an action brought under subsection (3) of this section. SECTION 9. (1)  FAA notice and obstruction evaluation required.  (a)  Any person proposing to construct a wind turbine or associated structure that meets the notice requirements of 14 CFR § 77.9, or any successor regulation, shall file the required notice with the Federal Aviation Administration and obtain an FAA obstruction evaluation before any state or local permit, approval or authorization is issued. (b)  No state agency, political subdivision, public utility or electric cooperative shall issue any permit, certificate, zoning approval or other authorization for a wind turbine or industrial wind facility unless a final FAA Determination of No Hazard to Air Navigation has been issued for each structure, and all conditions contained therein are incorporated as enforceable conditions of approval. (2)  Prohibition following hazard determination.  (a)  No wind turbine or associated structure shall be constructed, reconstructed or operated if the Federal aviation Administration issues a Determination of Hazard to Air Navigation, unless such determination is withdrawn and replaced with a determination of No Hazard. (b)  Any authorization issued in violation of this subsection is void and of no force or effect. (3)  Radar interference review.  (a)  As a condition of any approval granted under a limited exception to this act, an applicant shall demonstrate completion of all applicable federal radar interference reviews, including coordination through the FAA Obstruction Evaluation and Airport Airspace Analysis process and any Department of Defense or interagency review applicable to wind turbine radar impacts. (b)  If a participating federal agency determines that a proposed turbine or facility would cause unacceptable radar interference that cannot be mitigated through siting, design or operational restrictions, the turbine or facility shall not be approved or constructed. (c)  Any mitigation measures or conditions identified through federal review, including restrictions on turbine height, location, layout or operation, shall be incorporated as mandatory and enforceable conditions of state and local approval. (4)  State coordination. (a)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation, the Mississippi Public Service Commission and the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency shall, as appropriate, coordinate with federal agencies to ensure evaluation of aviation safety, air traffic operations, national defense, homeland security missions and weather radar impacts. (b)  These agencies may adopt rules or enter into memoranda of understanding consistent with federal guidance regarding wind turbine radar interference mitigation. (5)  Relationship to other provisions.  Compliance with this section is in addition to, and not in lieu of, all other prohibitions, siting restrictions, wildlife protections, decommissioning requirements and enforcement provisions of this act.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an industrial wind facility otherwise prohibited by Section 3 of this act. SECTION 10. (1)  Purpose.  The purpose of this section is to prevent, detect and remediate releases of oils, hydraulic fluids, grease and other polluting substances from wind energy systems and to ensure that wind turbine blades and major components are decommissioned, transported and disposed of or recycled in a manner that protects agriculture, water resources, wildlife and public health. (2)  Oil, grease and fluid management.  (a)  Each industrial wind facility and small wind energy system shall maintain an Oil, Grease and Fluid Management Plan approved by the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality (MDEQ). (b)  The plan shall include, at a minimum: (i)  An inventory of all oils, hydraulic fluids, lubricants and greases used; (ii)  Secondary containment and engineering controls to prevent releases; (iii)  Inspection and maintenance schedules designed to detect leaks; (iv)  Spill response procedures and personnel training; and (v)  Emergency notification and coordination procedures. (c)  Any release that threatens soil, surface water, groundwater, wetlands, drainage systems or agricultural land shall be immediately contained and reported to MDEQ and affected landowners within twelve (12) hours. (d)  All cleanup and remediation shall be conducted in accordance with standards established by MDEQ, at the operator's expense. (3)  Blade and component decommissioning.  (a)  In addition to the decommissioning plan required under Section 7 of this act, each industrial wind facility shall maintain a blade and component decommissioning plan approved by MDEQ. (b)  Wind turbines blades, nacelles, towers, transformers and other major components shall not be buried on site, abandoned or disposed of in a manner that impairs agricultural use, drainage or wildlife habitat. (c)  Upon decommissioning, all blades and above-ground components shall be removed, and disturbed areas restored in accordance with Section 7 of this act. (d)  Transportation and disposal or recycling of blades and components shall comply with all applicable state and federal laws. (e)  Financial assurance required under Section 7 of this act shall include the full cost of blade and component removal, transportation, recycling or disposal, without reliance on salvage value. (4)  Enforcement.  Failure to comply with this section constitutes a violation enforceable under Section 8 of this act. SECTION 11.  Severability. If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.  To this end, the provisions of this act are declared severable. SECTION 12.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall apply to every relevant permit, contract, lease, approval or authorization executed on or after that date.